Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.280

Local government reimbursement claims.

If chapter 217, Laws of 1998 mandates an increased level of service by local governments, the local government may, under RCW 43.135.060 and chapter 4.92 RCW, submit claims for reimbursement by the legislature. The claims shall be subject to verification by the department of enterprise services.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 518; 1998 c 217 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.